Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.025

Portion of filing fees to be remitted to state treasurer.

Forty-six percent of the money received from filing fees paid pursuant to RCW 36.18.020, except those collected for the filing of warrants for unpaid taxes or overpayments by state agencies as outlined in RCW 36.18.012(10), shall be transmitted by the county treasurer each month to the state treasurer for deposit in the state general fund.

[ 2009 c 479 s 22; 2001 c 146 s 3; 1992 c 54 s 2; 1985 c 389 s 9; 1984 c 258 s 322; 1972 ex.s. c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Effective date—1992 c 54: See note following RCW 36.18.020.

Effective date—1985 c 389: See note following RCW 27.24.070.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.

Effective date—1972 ex.s. c 20: See note following RCW 36.18.020.